Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
CHAPTER 389 Sales of Realty of Persons Under Disability [Repealed]

389.010.
Provisions governing sales of realty of infants and persons of unsound mind. [Repealed.]

389.015.
Duration of bonds required by KRS 389.010. [Repealed.]

389.020.
Sale by court order of realty jointly owned — Action for confirmation of sale — Action for division and distribution of sale proceeds of property involving life estate and remainder. [Repealed.]

389.030.
Sale of reversion or remainder interest — Custody and reinvestment of proceeds. [Repealed.]

389.035.
Procedure for obtaining court approval for sale or mortgage of land in trust subject to life estate — Disposition of proceeds — Duties of life tenant. [Repealed.]

389.040.
Provisions governing sales and contingent interests — Reinvestment of proceeds. [Repealed.]

389.045.
Miscellaneous provisions governing sales. [Repealed.]

389.050.
Sale of dower. [Repealed.]

389.055.
Sale where share valued at less than $100. [Repealed.]

389.060.
Lien to secure payment of proceeds — Collection of interest and proceeds — Purchaser may pay amount due into court. [Repealed.]